Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.220

Compensation boards—Meetings—Claims not necessitating board meeting.

Said compensation board shall meet on the call of its chair on a regular monthly meeting day when there is business to come before it. The chair shall be required to call a meeting on any monthly meeting day when any claim for compensation under this chapter has been submitted to the board: PROVIDED, That as to claims involving amounts of two thousand dollars or less, the local organization director shall submit recommendations directly to the state without convening a compensation board.

[ 2011 c 336 s 795; 1984 c 38 s 24; 1971 ex.s. c 8 s 3; 1953 c 223 s 5.]